Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 1. Livestock Remedies Generally

§ 11-17-101.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011,
ch. 98, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1929, ch. 70, § 1, related to definition of “livestock remedy.”

Laws 2011, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 11-17-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011,
ch. 98, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1929, ch. 70, § 2, related to file a statement and certificate with department of agriculture.

Laws 2011, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 11-17-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011,
ch. 98, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1929, ch. 70, § 7, related to refusal or cancellation of registration and refusal to allow changes of ingredients.

Laws 2011, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 11-17-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011,
ch. 98, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1929, ch. 70, § 4, related to inspections of buildings used in manufacture and purchase and analysis of samples.

Laws 2011, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 11-17-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011,
ch. 98, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1929, ch. 70, § 3, related to labeling.

Laws 2011, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 11-17-106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011,
ch. 98, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1929, ch. 70, § 5, related to chemical analysis of samples.

Laws 2011, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 11-17-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011,
ch. 98, § 2.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1929, ch. 70, § 6, related to hearing on violations, notice to manufacturer, and certification of facts to district attorney.

Laws 2011, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 11-17-108.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011,
ch. 98, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1929, ch. 70, § 8, related to prohibited acts and penalties for violations.

Laws 2011, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.